Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. Communicable Diseases

Cross references. —

As to powers and duties generally relative to communicable diseases, see §

35-1-223

and

35-1-240

.

For powers of cities and towns, see §

15-1-103

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Health §§ 52, 69, 98.

Extent of liability of seller of livestock infected with communicable disease, 87 ALR2d 1317.

Validity of statutes, ordinances, and regulations requiring the installation or maintenance of various bathroom facilities in dwelling units, 79 ALR3d 716.

Consumers' rights and remedies, under modern state regulation, with respect to formaldehyde foam insulation considered as a health hazard, 38 ALR4th 1064.

Propriety of state or local government health officer's warrantless search — post-Camara cases, 53 ALR4th 1168.

39A C.J.S. Health and Environment §§ 18 to 25.